Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Taxes

281.810.
Weight tax on motor vechicles engaged in transportation for hire; license fee for driveaways; weight tags. [Repealed.]

281.811.
Excise tax on wreckers. [Repealed.]

281.812.
Seat tax on airport limousines. [Repealed.]

281.813.
Weight tax on U-Drive-It vehicles used in the transportation of property. [Repealed.]

281.814.
Exemptions from motor vehicle weight tax. [Repealed.]

281.815.
Seat and mileage taxes. [Repealed.]

281.816.
Privilege tax on motor vehicles used by carriers and motor carriers engaged in transporting motor vehicles; rate. [Repealed.]

281.817.
Motor carrier operating as driveaway to procure license tag from department; license fee; tag may be transferred. [Repealed.]

281.818.
Truck dealer-demonstrator tax. [Repealed.]

281.820.
Accounts and records for tax and regulation purposes.

The department may require any motor carrier to keep within this state, subject to inspection at all reasonable times by the department, such books of account or other records as are reasonably necessary to enable the department to obtain full information at all times regarding the amounts due from such operator in fees or taxes and in order to regulate the motor carrier’s operation. The books and records shall be at all times open to inspection by, but shall not be kept or retained by, the department.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 51; 1970, ch. 57, § 6; 2015 ch. 19, § 27, effective June 24, 2015.

281.825.
Monthly payment of mileage tax; proportionate payment of seat or weight tax on vehicle beginning operation after January 1; credit for tax paid on vehicle that is burned, sold or inoperative. [Repealed.]

281.826.
Taxes imposed and licenses issued under KRS 281.813 to be subject to KRS 281.825 (2) and (3). [Repealed.]

281.830.
Fees and taxes under this chapter are in addition to others — Limitations on fees and taxes imposed by cities and counties.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS

138.470

,

186.020

and

186.050

and in subsection (2) of this section, the fees and taxes prescribed by this chapter shall be in addition to the fees and taxes prescribed by any other law of this state.

A city or county shall not impose a license fee or tax upon any intrastate taxicab, limousine, disabled persons vehicle, or TNC vehicle operated under a certificate, except that a city may impose an annual license fee as set out in KRS 281.631(6).

A city or county shall not impose or collect any fee or tax of any kind upon any interstate or intrastate commercial private or for-hire motor carrier vehicle for loading or unloading of property, including household goods.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 53; 1960, ch. 139, § 9; 1968, ch. 152, § 136; 1972, ch. 269, § 8; 1984, ch. 151, § 6, effective July 13, 1984; 2015 ch. 19, § 28, effective June 24, 2015.

281.835.
Reciprocal tax exemptions for nonresident carriers operating in interstate commerce.

To carry out the declaration of policy provided for in this chapter, the department may enter into reciprocal agreements with other jurisdictions whereby motor vehicles, as defined in KRS

186.010

and

281.010

, while operating into or through the Commonwealth of Kentucky in interstate commerce and properly licensed in another state, shall be exempt in whole or in part from registration fees and seat and mileage taxes under KRS Chapter 186, provided like or similar privileges are granted motor vehicles, as defined in KRS

186.010

and

281.010

, properly licensed in this state.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 54; 1952, ch. 20; 1958, ch. 130, § 18; 1966, ch. 139, § 29; 2015 ch. 19, § 29, effective June 24, 2015.

281.836.
Department directed to negotiate with other states for purpose of developing reciprocal method of proportionate registration of fleets of motor vehicles.

The Department of Vehicle Regulation is authorized and directed to negotiate with other states pursuant to the provisions of KRS

281.835

for the purpose of developing a reciprocal method of proportionate registration of fleets of motor vehicles engaged in interstate commerce and operating into or through the Commonwealth of Kentucky. Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS

186.020

, the department may promulgate regulations concerning the registration of motor vehicles under this section and may provide for direct issuance by it of evidence of payment of any registration fees required hereunder.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 18; 1966, ch. 139, § 30.

281.838.
Temporary permit for nonresident not covered by reciprocal agreement.

Any person who is a nonresident of the Commonwealth of Kentucky and who operates any motor vehicle as defined in KRS

281.010

not entitled to exemption from the payment of the fees imposed by KRS

186.050

by reason of the terms of a reciprocal agreement existing between the Commonwealth of Kentucky and the state in which such vehicle is licensed, may, in lieu of the payment of the fees imposed by KRS

186.050

, obtain from the Department of Vehicle Regulation a temporary permit. Under regulations adopted by the Department of Vehicle Regulation application for such a temporary permit shall be made and such permits shall be issued for a specified period not exceeding ten (10) days, and for a specific vehicle. The fee for each permit shall be twenty-five ($25) dollars for any vehicle subject to the fees in KRS 186.050 for a vehicle and any towed unit with a declared gross weight of fifty-five thousand (55,000) pounds or less; or forty dollars ($40) for any vehicle subject to the fees in KRS 186.050 for a vehicle and any towed unit with a declared gross weight of fifty-five thousand one (55,001) pounds or more.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 96, § 6; 1966, ch. 139, § 31; 1988, ch. 175, § 12, effective April 1, 1988; 2015 ch. 19, § 30, effective June 24, 2015.

281.840.
Transfer of functions, facilities, proceedings and funds of former Division of Motor Transportation. [Repealed.]

281.850.
Automobile utility trailer lessor’s permit. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 139, § 3, effective June 16, 1960; 1996, ch. 318, § 208, effective July 15, 1996; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

281.855.
Classification of trailers as private passenger automobiles for purpose of reciprocal provisions.

For the purpose of the interstate and intrastate reciprocal provisions of this chapter and KRS Chapter 186, automobile utility trailers shall be classified the same as private passenger automobiles and extended the same privileges, provided, however, that every automobile utility trailer lessor shall register with the department, license and pay all applicable taxes on a number of such trailers equal to the average number of automobile utility trailers he operated during the previous licensing year in and through the Commonwealth of Kentucky. Thereafter, all such trailers properly identified and licensed in any state, territory, province, country, or the District of Columbia, and belonging to such person, shall be permitted to operate in this state in both interstate and intrastate commerce. The burden of submitting verifiable data as to the average number of automobile utility trailers operating in and through the Commonwealth of Kentucky shall be on the automobile utility trailer lessor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 139, § 4.

281.860.
Annual tax on utility trailer. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 139, § 5, effective June 16, 1960; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.